California, session 20252026, AB1346.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 68074 of the Education Code is amended to read:68074. (a) A student who is a natural or adopted child, stepchild, or spouse who is a dependent of a member of the Armed Forces of the United States stationed in this state on active duty is entitled to resident classification only for the purpose of determining the amount of tuition and fees.(b) If that member of the Armed Forces of the United States, whose dependent natural or adopted child, stepchild, or spouse is in attendance at, or has been admitted to, a public postsecondary institution, (1) is thereafter transferred on military orders to a place outside this state where the member continues to serve in the Armed Forces of the United States, or (2) is thereafter retired as an active member of the Armed Forces of the United States, the student dependent shall not lose his or her their resident classification so long as he or she the student remains continuously enrolled at that institution. institution or is granted to reenrollment pursuant to Section 66208.